Utah statutes.
59-13-103.   List of clean fuels provided to tax commission -- Report to the Legislature.

(1)  The Air Quality Board shall annually provide to the tax commission a list of fuels that are clean fuels under Section 59-13-102.

(2)  The Air Quality Board created under Section 19-2-103 shall in conjunction with the State Tax Commission prepare and submit to the Legislature before January 1, 1995, a report evaluating the impacts, benefits, and economic consequences of the clean fuel provisions of Sections 59-13-201 and 59-13-301.

